Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB639.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 101 of the act of January 30, 1974 (P.L.13, No.6), referred to as the Loan Interest and Protection 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Law, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 101. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *"Provider" means:(a) A person who extends a specific offer of commercial financing to a recipient.(b) A nondepository institution that enters into a written agreement with a depository institution to arrange for the extension of commercial financing by the depository institution to a recipient via an online lending platform administered by the nondepository institution.* * *"Small business" means a business of fewer than five hundred (500) employees that is presented a specific commercial financing offer by a provider.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 407.1. Truth in Lending.--A provider subject to this act shall disclose the following information, if applicable, to a small business at the time of executing a specific commercial financing offer and shall obtain a signature of the small business's agent for each disclosure before executing the commercial financing transaction:(1) The total amount of funds provided. (2) The total dollar cost of the financing. (3) The term or estimated term. (4) The method, frequency and amount of each payment. (5) A description of prepayment policies. (6) The total cost of the financing expressed as an annualized rate.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0639PN0649 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930